California statutes. Penal Code
(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if showers are temporarily unavailable or otherwise limited in frequency, staff shall provide written or electronic notification that includes the reason showers are unavailable or limited. The notice shall be made available to any incarcerated person in the affected housing unit and shall be conspicuously posted in the affected housing unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 429, Sec. 1.   (AB 353)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2084.5.

(a) A state prison or youth residential placement or detention center operated by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide persons in their custody and confined in a correctional or detention facility with accessible, functional voice communication services free of charge to the person initiating and the person receiving the communication. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall have operational discretion in implementing this subdivision such that free voice communication services do not interfere with necessary programming.

(b) A state agency shall not
 receive revenue from the provision of voice communication services or any other communication services to a person confined in a state correctional or detention
 facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 827, Sec. 2.   (SB 1008)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2085.

The department shall keep a correct account of all money and valuables upon the prisoner when delivered at the prison, and shall pay the amount, or the proceeds thereof, or return the same to the prisoner when discharged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 890.)
-------------------------------------------

2085.5.

(a) If a prisoner owes a restitution fine imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13967 of the Government Code, as operative prior to September 29, 1994, subdivision (b) of Section 730.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as operative prior to January 1, 2025, or subdivision (b) of Section 1202.4 of this code, the secretary shall deduct a minimum of 20 percent or the balance owing on the fine amount, whichever is less, up to a maximum of 50 percent from the wages and trust account deposits of a prisoner, unless prohibited by federal law, and shall transfer that amount to the California Victim Compensation Board for deposit in the Restitution Fund. The amount deducted shall be credited against the amount owing on the fine. The sentencing court
 shall be provided a record of the payments.

(b) (1) If a prisoner is punished by imprisonment in a county jail pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 and owes a restitution fine imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13967 of the Government Code, as operative prior to September 29, 1994, subdivision (b) of Section 730.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as operative prior to January 1, 2025, or subdivision (b) of Section 1202.4 of this code, the agency designated by the board of supervisors in a county where the prisoner is incarcerated is authorized to deduct a minimum of 20 percent or the balance owing on the fine amount, whichever is less, up to a maximum of 50 percent from the county jail equivalent of wages and trust account deposits of a prisoner, unless prohibited by federal law, and shall
 transfer that amount to the California Victim Compensation Board for deposit in the Restitution Fund. The amount deducted shall be credited against the amount owing on the fine. The sentencing court shall be provided a record of the payments.

(2) If the board of supervisors designates the county sheriff as the collecting agency, the board of supervisors shall first obtain the concurrence of the county sheriff.

(c) If a prisoner owes a restitution order imposed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13967 of the Government Code, as operative prior to September 29, 1994, subdivision (b) of Section 730.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or subdivision (f) of Section 1202.4 of this code, the secretary shall deduct a minimum of 20 percent or the balance owing on the order
 amount, whichever is less, up to a maximum of 50 percent from the wages and trust account deposits of a prisoner, unless prohibited by federal law. The secretary shall transfer that amount to the California Victim Compensation Board for direct payment to the victim, or payment shall be made to the Restitution Fund to the extent that the victim has received assistance pursuant to that program. The sentencing court shall be provided a record of the payments made to victims and of the payments deposited to the Restitution Fund pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) If a prisoner is punished by imprisonment in a county jail pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 and owes a restitution order imposed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13967 of the Government Code, as operative prior to September 29, 1994,
 subdivision (b) of Section 730.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or subdivision (b) of Section 1202.4 of this code, the agency designated by the board of supervisors in the county where the prisoner is incarcerated is authorized to deduct a minimum of 20 percent or the balance owing on the order amount, whichever is less, up to a maximum of 50 percent from the county jail equivalent of wages and trust account deposits of a prisoner, unless prohibited by federal law. The agency shall transfer that amount to the California Victim Compensation Board for direct payment to the victim, or payment shall be made to the Restitution Fund to the extent that the victim has received assistance pursuant to that program, or may pay the victim directly. The sentencing court shall be provided a record of the payments made to the victims and of the payments deposited to the Restitution Fund pursuant
 to this subdivision.

(e) In any case in which a parolee owes a restitution fine imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13967 of the Government Code, as operative prior to September 29, 1994, subdivision (b) of Section 730.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as operative prior to January 1, 2025, or subdivision (b) of Section 1202.4 of this code, either the secretary or, if a prisoner is punished by imprisonment in a county jail pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, the agency designated by the board of supervisors in the county where the prisoner is incarcerated may collect from the parolee any moneys owing on the restitution fine amount, unless prohibited by federal law. The secretary or the agency shall transfer that amount to the California
 Victim Compensation Board for deposit in the Restitution Fund. The amount deducted shall be credited against the amount owing on the fine. The sentencing court shall be provided a record of the payments.

(f) In any case in which a parolee owes a direct order of restitution, imposed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13967 of the Government Code, as operative prior to September 29, 1994, subdivision (b) of Section 730.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1202.4, either the secretary or, if a prisoner is punished by imprisonment in a county jail pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, the agency designated by the board of supervisors in the county where the prisoner is incarcerated or a local collection program may collect from the parolee any moneys owing, unless prohibited
 by federal law. The secretary or the agency shall transfer that amount to the California Victim Compensation Board for direct payment to the victim, or payment shall be made to the Restitution Fund to the extent that the victim has received assistance pursuant to that program, or the agency may pay the victim directly. The sentencing court shall be provided a record of the payments made by the parolee pursuant to this subdivision.

(g) If a prisoner has both a restitution fine and a restitution order from the sentencing court, the department shall collect the restitution order first pursuant to subdivision (c).

(h) If a prisoner is punished by imprisonment in a county jail pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 and that prisoner has both a restitution fine and a restitution
 order from the sentencing court, if the agency designated by the board of supervisors in the county where the prisoner is incarcerated collects the fine and order, the agency shall collect the restitution order first pursuant to subdivision (d).

(i) If a parolee has both a restitution fine and a restitution order from the sentencing court, either the department or, if the prisoner is punished by imprisonment in a county jail pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, the agency designated by the board of supervisors in the county where the prisoner is incarcerated may collect the restitution order first, pursuant to subdivision (f).

(j) If an inmate is housed at an institution that requires food to be purchased from the institution canteen for unsupervised overnight
 visits, and if the money for the purchase of this food is received from funds other than the inmate’s wages, that money shall be exempt from restitution deductions. This exemption shall apply to the actual amount spent on food for the visit up to a maximum of fifty dollars ($50) for visits that include the inmate and one visitor, seventy dollars ($70) for visits that include the inmate and two or three visitors, and eighty dollars ($80) for visits that include the inmate and four or more visitors.

(k) (1) Amounts transferred to the California Victim Compensation Board for payment of direct orders of restitution shall be paid to the victim within 60 days from the date the restitution revenues are received by the California Victim Compensation Board. If the restitution payment to a victim is less than twenty-five dollars ($25),
 then payment need not be forwarded to that victim until the payment reaches twenty-five dollars ($25) or when the victim requests payment of the lesser amount.

(2) If a victim cannot be located, the restitution revenues received by the California Victim Compensation Board on behalf of the victim shall be held in trust in the Restitution Fund until the end of the state fiscal year subsequent to the state fiscal year in which the funds were deposited or until the time that the victim has provided current address information, whichever occurs sooner. Amounts remaining in trust at the end of the specified period of time shall revert to the Restitution Fund.

(3) (A) A victim failing to provide a current address within the period of time specified in paragraph (2) may
 provide documentation to the department, which shall verify that moneys were collected on behalf of the victim. Upon receipt of that verified information from the department, the California Victim Compensation Board shall transmit the restitution revenues to the victim in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (c) or (f).

(B) A victim failing to provide a current address within the period of time specified in paragraph (2) may provide documentation to the agency designated by the board of supervisors in the county where the prisoner punished by imprisonment in a county jail pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 is incarcerated, which may verify that moneys were collected on behalf of the victim. Upon receipt of that verified information from the agency, the California Victim Compensation Board shall transmit the
 restitution revenues to the victim in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (d) or (f).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 805, Sec. 2.   (AB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2085.6.

(a) When a prisoner who owes a restitution fine, or any portion thereof, is subsequently released from the custody of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or a county jail facility, and is subject to postrelease community supervision under Section 3451 or mandatory supervision under subdivision (h) of Section 1170, the prisoner shall have a continuing obligation to pay the restitution fine in full. The restitution fine obligation and any portion left unsatisfied upon placement in postrelease community supervision or mandatory supervision is enforceable and may be collected, in a manner to be established by the county board of supervisors, by the department or county agency designated by the board of supervisors in the county where the prisoner
 is released. If a county elects to collect restitution fines, the department or county agency designated by the county board of supervisors shall transfer the amount collected to the California Victim Compensation Board for deposit in the Restitution Fund in the State Treasury.

(b) When a prisoner who owes payment for a restitution order, or any portion thereof, is released from the custody of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or a county jail facility, and is subject to postrelease community supervision under Section 3451 or mandatory supervision under subdivision (h) of Section 1170, the prisoner shall have a continuing obligation to pay the restitution order in full. The restitution order obligation and any portion left unsatisfied upon placement in postrelease community supervision or mandatory supervision is enforceable and
 may be collected, in a manner to be established by the county board of supervisors, by the agency designated by the county board of supervisors in the county where the prisoner is released. If the county elects to collect the restitution order, the agency designated by the county board of supervisors for collection shall transfer the collected amount to the California Victim Compensation Board for deposit in the Restitution Fund in the State Treasury or may pay the victim directly. The sentencing court shall be provided a record of payments made to the victim and of the payments deposited into the Restitution Fund.

(c) Any portion of a restitution order or restitution fine that remains unsatisfied after an individual is released from postrelease community supervision or mandatory supervision shall continue to be enforceable by a victim
 pursuant to Section 1214 until the obligation is satisfied.

(d) If a county elects to collect both a restitution fine and a restitution order, the amount owed on the restitution order shall be collected before the restitution fine.

(e) If a county elects to collect restitution fines and restitution orders pursuant to this section, the county shall coordinate efforts with the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Section 19280 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(f) Pursuant to Section 1214, the county agency selected by a county board of supervisors to collect restitution fines and restitution orders may collect restitution fines and restitution orders after an individual is no longer on postrelease community supervision or
 mandatory supervision or after a term in custody pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Restitution fine” means a fine imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13967 of the Government Code, as operative prior to September 29, 1994, subdivision (b) of Section 730.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as operative prior to January 1, 2025, or subdivision (b) of Section 1202.4.

(2) “Restitution order” means an order for restitution to the victim of a crime imposed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13967 of the Government Code, as operative prior to September 29, 1994, subdivision (b) of
 Section 730.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or subdivision (f) of Section 1202.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 805, Sec. 3.   (AB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2085.7.

(a) When a prisoner who owes a restitution fine, or any portion thereof, is released from the custody of a county jail facility after completion of a term in custody pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170, the prisoner has a continuing obligation to pay the restitution fine in full. The balance of the restitution fine remaining unpaid after completion of a term in custody pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170 is enforceable and may be collected, in a manner to be established by the county board of supervisors, by the department or county agency designated by the board of supervisors in the county in which the prisoner is released. If a county elects to collect
 restitution fines, the department or county agency designated by the county board of supervisors shall transfer the amount collected to the California Victim Compensation Board for deposit in the Restitution Fund.

(b) When a prisoner who owes payment for a restitution order, or any portion thereof, is released from the custody of a county jail facility after completion of a term in custody pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170, the prisoner has a continuing obligation to pay the restitution order in full. The balance of the restitution order remaining unpaid after completion of a term in custody pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170 is enforceable and may be collected, in a manner to be established by the county board of supervisors, by the agency
 designated by the county board of supervisors in the county in which the prisoner is released. If the county elects to collect the restitution order, the agency designated by the county board of supervisors for collection shall transfer the collected amount to the California Victim Compensation Board for deposit in the Restitution Fund or may pay the victim directly. The sentencing court shall be provided a record of payments made to the victim and of the payments deposited into the Restitution Fund.

(c) The amount of a restitution order or restitution fine that remains unsatisfied after completion of a term in custody pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170 is to be enforceable by a victim pursuant to Section 1214 until the obligation is satisfied.

(d) If a county elects to collect both a restitution fine and a restitution order, the amount owed on the restitution order shall be collected before the restitution fine.

(e) If a county elects to collect restitution fines and restitution orders pursuant to this section, the county shall coordinate efforts with the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Section 19280 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(f) Pursuant to Section 1214, the county agency selected by a county board of supervisors to collect restitution fines and restitution orders may collect restitution fines and restitution orders after an individual has completed a term in custody pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Restitution fine” means a fine imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13967 of the Government Code, as operative prior to September 29, 1994, subdivision (b) of Section 730.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as operative prior to January 1, 2025, or subdivision (b) of Section 1202.4.

(2) “Restitution order” means an order for restitution to the victim of a crime imposed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13967 of the Government Code, as operative prior to September 29, 1994, subdivision (b) of Section 730.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or subdivision (f) of Section 1202.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 805, Sec. 4.   (AB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2085.8.

(a) Compensatory or punitive damages awarded by trial or settlement to any inmate, parolee, person placed on postrelease community supervision pursuant to Section 3451, or defendant on mandatory supervision imposed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170 in connection with a civil action brought against a federal, state, or local jail, prison, or correctional facility, or any official or agent thereof, shall be paid directly, after payment of reasonable attorney’s fees and litigation costs approved by the court, to satisfy any outstanding restitution orders or restitution fines against that person. The balance of the award shall be forwarded to the payee after full payment of all outstanding restitution orders and restitution
 fines, subject to subdivision (c).

(b) The department shall make all reasonable efforts to notify the victims of the crime for which that person was convicted concerning the pending payment of any compensatory or punitive damages. For any prisoner punished by imprisonment in a county jail pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, the agency may make all reasonable efforts to notify the victims of the crime for which that person was convicted concerning the pending payment of any compensatory or punitive damages.

(c) (1) The secretary shall deduct and retain from any prisoner or parolee settlement or trial award an administrative fee that totals 5 percent of any amount paid from the settlement or award to satisfy an outstanding restitution order or fine, unless prohibited by federal law.

(2) The agency may deduct and retain from any settlement or trial award of a person previously imprisoned in county jail an administrative fee that totals 5 percent of any amount paid from the settlement or award to satisfy an outstanding restitution order or fine, unless prohibited by federal law.

(3) The secretary or the agency shall deposit the administrative fee moneys in a special deposit account for reimbursing administrative and support costs of the department’s or agency’s restitution program, as applicable. The secretary, at his or her discretion, or the agency may either retain any excess funds in the special deposit account for future reimbursement of the department’s or agency’s administrative and support costs for the restitution program or may transfer all or part of the excess funds for deposit in the Restitution Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 718, Sec. 3.   (SB 1054)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2086.

The wardens may make temporary rules and regulations, in case of emergency, to remain in force until the department otherwise provides.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1944, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2087.

The wardens shall perform such other duties as may be prescribed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2256.)
-------------------------------------------

2090.

The department is hereby authorized to receive from the Federal Government any federal prisoner and to charge and receive from the United States, for the use of the State, an amount sufficient for the support of each such federal prisoner, the cost of all clothing that may be furnished, and one dollar ($1) per month for the use of the prisoner. No other or further charges shall be made by any officer for or on account of such prisoners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2256.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Prohibition Upon Wardens, Clerks, Officers and Employees [2540. - 2541.]

2540.

No officer or employee of the department shall receive directly, or indirectly, any compensation for his services other than that prescribed or authorized by law or the director; nor shall he receive any compensation whatever, directly or indirectly, for any act or service which he may do or perform for or on behalf of any contractor, or agent, or employee of a contractor. For any violation of the provisions of this section the officer or employee shall be discharged from his office or service; and every contractor, or employee, or agent of a contractor engaged therein, shall be expelled from the prison grounds, and not again permitted within the same as a contractor, agent, or employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2256.)
-------------------------------------------

2541.

No officer or employee of the department, or contractor, or employee of a contractor, shall, without permission of the director, make any gift or present to a prisoner, or receive any from a prisoner, or have any barter or dealings with a prisoner. For every violation of the provisions of this section, the party engaged therein shall incur the same penalty as prescribed in the preceding section. No officer or employee of the prison shall be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract or purchase made or authorized to be made by anyone for or on behalf of the prisons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2256.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Civil Rights of Prisoners [2600. - 2644.]



  ARTICLE 1. Civil Rights [2600. - 2607.]

2600.

(a) A person sentenced to imprisonment in a state prison or to imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 may during that period of confinement be deprived of such rights, and only such rights, as is reasonably related to legitimate penological interests.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to overturn the decision in Thor v. Superior Court, 5 Cal. 4th 725.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 462) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 665, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 1114)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2601.

Subject only to the provisions of that section, each person described in Section 2600 shall have the following civil rights:

(a) Except as provided in Section 2225 of the Civil Code, to inherit, own, sell, or convey real or personal property, including all written and artistic material produced or created by the person during the period of imprisonment. However, to the extent authorized in Section 2600, the Department of Corrections may restrict or prohibit sales or conveyances that are made for business purposes.

(b) To correspond, confidentially, with any member of the State Bar or holder of public office, provided that the prison authorities may open and inspect incoming mail to search for contraband.

(c) (1) To purchase, receive, and read any and all newspapers, periodicals, and books accepted for distribution by the United States Post Office. Pursuant to this section, prison authorities may exclude any of the following matter:

(A) Obscene publications or writings, and mail containing information concerning where, how, or from whom this matter may be obtained.

(B) Any matter of a character tending to incite murder, arson, riot, violent racism, or any other form of violence.

(C) Any matter concerning gambling or a lottery.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the right of prison authorities to do the following:

(A) Open and inspect any and all packages received by an inmate.

(B) Establish reasonable restrictions as to the number of newspapers, magazines, and books that the inmate may have in his or her cell or elsewhere in the prison at one time.

(d) To initiate civil actions, subject to a three dollar ($3) filing fee to be collected by the Department of Corrections, in addition to any other filing fee authorized by law, and subject to Title 3a (commencing with Section 391) of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) To marry.

(f) To create a power of appointment.

(g) To make a will.

(h) To receive all benefits provided for in Sections 3370 and 3371 of the Labor Code and in Section 5069.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 886, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2602.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no person sentenced to imprisonment or housed in a state prison shall be administered any psychiatric medication without his or her prior informed consent.

(b) If a psychiatrist determines that an inmate should be treated with psychiatric medication, but the inmate does not consent, the inmate may be involuntarily treated with the medication. Treatment may be given on either a nonemergency basis as provided in subdivision (c), or on an emergency or interim basis as provided in subdivision (d).

(c) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may seek to initiate involuntary medication on a nonemergency basis only if all of the following conditions have been
 met:

(1) A psychiatrist has determined that the inmate has a serious mental disorder.

(2) A psychiatrist has determined that, as a result of that mental disorder, the inmate is gravely disabled and does not have the capacity to refuse treatment with psychiatric medications or is a danger to self or others.

(3) A psychiatrist has prescribed one or more psychiatric medications for the treatment of the inmate’s disorder, has considered the risks, benefits, and treatment alternatives to involuntary medication, and has determined that the treatment alternatives to involuntary medication are unlikely to meet the needs of the patient.

(4) The inmate has been advised of the risks and benefits of, and treatment alternatives to, the psychiatric medication and
 refuses or is unable to consent to the administration of the medication.

(5) The inmate is provided a hearing before an administrative law judge.

(6) The inmate is provided counsel at least 21 days prior to the hearing, unless emergency or interim medication is being administered pursuant to subdivision (d), in which case the inmate would receive expedited access to counsel. The hearing shall be held not more than 30 days after the filing of the notice with the Office of Administrative Hearings, unless counsel for the inmate agrees to extend the date of the hearing.

(7) The inmate and counsel are provided with written notice of the hearing at least 21 days prior to the hearing, unless emergency or interim medication is being administered pursuant to subdivision (d), in which case the inmate would receive an expedited
 hearing. The written notice shall do all of the following:

(A) Set forth the diagnosis, the factual basis for the diagnosis, the basis upon which psychiatric medication is recommended, the expected benefits of the medication, any potential side effects and risks to the inmate from the medication, and any alternatives to treatment with the medication.

(B) Advise the inmate of the right to be present at the hearing, the right to be represented by counsel at all stages of the proceedings, the right to present evidence, and the right to cross-examine witnesses. Counsel for the inmate shall have access to all medical records and files of the inmate, but shall not have access to the confidential section of the inmate’s central file which contains materials unrelated to medical treatment.

(C) Inform the inmate of his or her
 right to contest the finding of an administrative law judge authorizing treatment with involuntary medication by filing a petition for writ of administrative mandamus pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and his or her right to file a petition for writ of habeas corpus with respect to any decision of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to continue treatment with involuntary medication after the administrative law judge has authorized treatment with involuntary medication.

(8) An administrative law judge determines by clear and convincing evidence that the inmate has a mental illness or disorder, that as a result of that illness the inmate is gravely disabled and lacks the capacity to consent to or refuse treatment with psychiatric medications or is a danger to self or others if not medicated, that there is no less intrusive alternative to involuntary medication, and that the medication is in the inmate’s best
 medical interest. Failure of the department to provide timely or adequate notice pursuant to this section shall be excused only upon a showing of good cause and the absence of prejudice to the inmate. In making this determination, the administrative law judge may consider factors, including, but not limited to, the ability of the inmate’s counsel to adequately prepare the case and to confer with the inmate, the continuity of care, and, if applicable, the need for protection of the inmate or institutional staff that would be compromised by a procedural default.

(9) The historical course of the inmate’s mental disorder, as determined by available relevant information about the course of the inmate’s mental disorder, shall be considered when it has direct bearing on the determination of whether the inmate is a danger to self or others, or is gravely disabled and incompetent to refuse medication as the result of a mental disorder.

(10) An inmate is entitled to file one motion for reconsideration following a determination that he or she may receive involuntary medication, and may seek a hearing to present new evidence, upon good cause shown.

(d) This section does not prohibit a physician from taking appropriate action in an emergency. An emergency exists when there is a sudden and marked change in an inmate’s mental condition so that action is immediately necessary for the preservation of life or the prevention of serious bodily harm to the inmate or others, and it is impractical, due to the seriousness of the emergency, to first obtain informed consent. If psychiatric medication is administered during an emergency, the medication shall only be that which is required to treat the emergency condition and shall be administered for only so long as the emergency continues to exist. If the Department of Corrections
 and Rehabilitation’s clinicians identify a situation that jeopardizes the inmate’s health or well-being as the result of a serious mental illness, and necessitates the continuation of medication beyond the initial 72 hours pending the full mental health hearing, the department shall give notice to the inmate and his or her counsel of the department’s intention to seek an ex parte order to allow the continuance of medication pending the full hearing. The notice shall be served upon the inmate and counsel at the same time the inmate is given the written notice that the involuntary medication proceedings are being initiated and is appointed counsel as provided in subdivision (c). The order may be issued ex parte upon a showing that in the absence of the medication the emergency conditions are likely to recur. The request for an ex parte order shall be supported by an affidavit from the psychiatrist showing specific facts. The inmate and the inmate’s appointed counsel shall have two business days to respond to
 the department’s ex parte request to continue interim medication, and may present facts supported by an affidavit in opposition to the department’s request. An administrative law judge shall review the ex parte request and shall have three business days to determine the merits of the department’s request for an ex parte order. If an order is issued, the psychiatrist may continue the administration of the medication until the hearing described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) is held.

(1) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall file with the Office of Administrative Hearings, and serve on the inmate and his or her counsel, the written notice described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) within 72 hours of commencing medication pursuant to this subdivision, unless either of the following occurs:

(A) The inmate gives informed consent to continue the medication.

(B) A psychiatrist determines that the psychiatric medication is not necessary and administration of the medication is discontinued.

(2) If medication is being administered pursuant to this subdivision, the hearing described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) shall commence within 21 days of the filing and service of the notice, unless counsel for an inmate agrees to a different period of time.

(3) With the exception of the timeline provisions specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) for providing notice and commencement of the hearing pursuant to the conditions specified in this subdivision, the inmate shall be entitled to and be given the same due process protections as specified in subdivision (c). The department shall prove the same elements supporting the involuntary administration of psychiatric medication and the
 administrative law judge shall be required to make the same findings described in subdivision (c).

(e) The determination that an inmate may receive involuntary medication shall be valid for one year from the date of the determination, regardless of whether the inmate subsequently gives his or her informed consent.

(f) If a determination has been made to involuntarily medicate an inmate pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d), the medication shall be discontinued one year after the date of that determination, unless the inmate gives his or her informed consent to the administration of the medication, or unless a new determination is made pursuant to the procedures set forth in subdivision (g).

(g) To renew an existing order allowing involuntary medication, the department shall file with the Office of Administrative
 Hearings, and shall serve on the inmate and his or her counsel, a written notice indicating the department’s intent to renew the existing involuntary medication order.

(1) The request to renew the order shall be filed and served no later than 21 days prior to the expiration of the current order authorizing involuntary medication.

(2) The inmate shall be entitled to, and shall be given, the same due process protections as specified in subdivision (c).

(3) Renewal orders shall be valid for one year from the date of the hearing.

(4) An order renewing an existing order shall be granted based on clear and convincing evidence that the inmate has a serious mental disorder that requires treatment with psychiatric medication, and that, but for the medication,
 the inmate would revert to the behavior that was the basis for the prior order authorizing involuntary medication, coupled with evidence that the inmate lacks insight regarding his or her need for the medication, such that it is unlikely that the inmate would be able to manage his or her own medication and treatment regimen. No new acts need be alleged or proven.

(5) If the department wishes to add a basis to an existing order, the department shall give the inmate and the inmate’s counsel notice in advance of the hearing via a renewal notice or supplemental petition. Within the renewal notice or supplemental petition, the department shall specify what additional basis is being alleged and what qualifying conduct within the past year supports that additional basis. The department shall prove the additional basis and conduct by clear and convincing evidence at a hearing as specified in subdivision (c).

(6) The hearing on any petition to renew an order for involuntary medication shall be conducted prior to the expiration of the current order.

(h) Pursuant to Section 5058, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall adopt regulations to fully implement this section.

(i) In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this section and the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code), this section shall control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 157.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2603.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), an inmate confined in a county jail shall not be administered any psychiatric medication without their prior informed consent.
